Utah statutes.
77-15a-106.   Limitations on admitting mental retardation examination
evidence.
(1)  The following may not be admitted into evidence against the defendant in
any criminal proceeding, except as provided in Subsection (2):
(a)  any statement made by the defendant in the course of any mental
examination conducted under this chapter, whether the examination is with or
without the consent of the defendant, and any testimony by the expert based
upon the defendant's statement; and
(b)  any other fruits of the defendant's statement under Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  Evidence under Subsection (1) may be admitted on an issue regarding a
mental condition on which the defendant has introduced evidence.
